Utah statutes.
78B-3-110.   Defense to civil action for damages resulting from commission of crime.

(1)  A person may not recover from the victim of a crime for personal injury or property damage if:

(a)  the person entered the property of the victim or the victim's family with criminal intent and the injury or damage was inflicted by the victim or occurred while the person was on the victim's property; or

(b)  the person committed a crime against the victim or the victim's family, during which the damage or injury occurred.

(2)  The provisions of Subsection (1) do not apply if the person can prove by clear and convincing evidence that the person's actions did not constitute a crime.

(3)  Subsection (1) applies to any next-of-kin, heirs, or personal representatives of the person if the person acquires a disability or is killed.

(4)  Subsections (1) and (2) do not apply if the person committing or attempting to commit the crime has clearly retreated from the criminal activity.

(5)  "Clearly retreated" means that the person committing the criminal act has fully, clearly, and immediately ceased all hostile, threatening, violent, or criminal behavior or activity.

